Hawaii statutes.
[§439-23] Right of injunction. The
department, in addition to any other remedies available, may apply to a court
having competent jurisdiction for an injunction to restrain any violation of
this chapter. [L 1987, c 154, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next